Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4949.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and in addition to other protections provided in this act, a person who that owns or operates or uses a sport shooting range that conforms to generally accepted operation practices in this state is not subject to civil liability or criminal prosecution in any matter relating to noise or noise pollution resulting from the operation or use of the range if the range is in compliance with any noise control laws or ordinances that applied to the range and its operation at the time of construction or initial operation of the range. This subsection applies even if the sport shooting range is updated or modified, including, but not limited to, ecological upgrades, safety upgrades, or range expansion, if the update or modification complies with generally accepted operation practices. (2) In addition to other protections provided in this act, a person who that owns, operates, or uses a sport shooting range that conforms to generally accepted operation practices is not subject to an action for nuisance, and a court of the state shall not enjoin or restrain the use or operation of a range on the basis of noise or noise pollution, if the range is in compliance with any noise control laws or ordinances that applied to the range and its operation at the time of construction or initial operation of the range. This subsection applies even if the sport shooting range is updated or modified, including, but not limited to, ecological upgrades, safety upgrades, or range expansion, if the update or modification complies with generally accepted operation practices. (3) Rules or regulations adopted by any state department or agency for limiting levels of noise in terms of decibel level which may occur in the outdoor atmosphere do not apply to a sport shooting range exempted from liability under this act. However, this subsection does not restrict the application of any provision of the generally accepted operation practices. Sec. 2a. (1) A sport shooting range that is operated and is not in violation of existing law at the time of the enactment of an ordinance shall be permitted to may continue in operation even if the operation of the sport shooting range at a later date does not conform to the new ordinance or an amendment to an existing ordinance. (2) A sport shooting range that is in existence as of the effective date of this section and operates in compliance with generally accepted operation practices, even if not in compliance with an ordinance of a local unit of government, shall be permitted to may do all of the following within its preexisting geographic boundaries if in compliance with generally accepted operation practices: (a) Repair, remodel, or reinforce any conforming or nonconforming building or structure as may be necessary in the interest of public safety or to secure the continued use of the building or structure. (b) Reconstruct, repair, restore, or resume the use of a nonconforming building damaged by fire, collapse, explosion, act of god, or act of war occurring after the effective date of this section. The reconstruction, repair, or restoration shall must be completed within not later than 1 year following the date of the damage or settlement of any property damage claim. If reconstruction, repair, or restoration is not completed within 1 year, continuation of the nonconforming use may be terminated in the discretion of the local unit of government. (c) Do anything authorized under generally accepted operation practices, including, but not limited to: (i) Expand or increase its membership or opportunities for public participation. (ii) Expand or increase events and activities.